Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1 General Provisions
62-6-111. License and examination — Transfer of license.

Anyone desiring to be licensed as a contractor for this state shall make written application to the board on forms prescribed by the board and shall furnish the board with an affidavit stating that the applicant is not currently performing any construction work and has not offered to engage in any construction work where the amount of the applicant's contract exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or, in the case of a limited licensed electrician, where the amount of the applicant's contract is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The application shall be accompanied by an application fee as set by the board. The application shall also be accompanied by evidence of the applicant's current workers' compensation insurance coverage. Failure to provide evidence of insurance coverage shall make the applicant ineligible for licensure by the board until evidence of insurance coverage is provided. Any application for initial licensure or for renewal of licensure also shall be accompanied by an affidavit affirming that the applicant maintains general liability insurance and workers' compensation insurance and specifying the amount of the insurance as well as any other information the board may require.

Anyone desiring to be licensed as a contractor for this state who resides in a state that does not practice reciprocity with licensees of the Tennessee board for licensing contractors shall make written application on forms prescribed by the board and shall attach an affidavit to the application stating that the applicant is not currently performing any construction work and has not offered to engage in any construction work in this state in which the amount of the applicant's contract exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or, in the case of a limited licensed electrician, in which the amount of the applicant's contract exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The application shall be accompanied by an application fee as set by the board. The application shall also be accompanied by evidence of the applicant's current workers' compensation insurance coverage. Failure to provide the evidence of insurance coverage shall make the applicant ineligible for licensure by the board until the evidence of insurance coverage is provided. Any application for initial licensure or for renewal of licensure also shall be accompanied by an affidavit affirming that the applicant maintains general liability insurance and workers' compensation insurance and specifying the amount of the insurance as well as any other information the board may require.

Notwithstanding any reciprocity for contractors which may otherwise exist between states, any person desiring to perform contracting services in this state as a licensed masonry contractor whether residing in this state or another state shall not be authorized to perform any such services unless the person takes and passes the masonry examination required pursuant to subsection (a)(2).

Anyone desiring to be licensed as a contractor in this state shall take a written examination to determine the applicant's qualifications. This examination may be given orally at the discretion of the board if a written examination is precluded by reason of disability. Each applicant shall pay an examination fee for each written or oral examination. If the results of the examination constitute a passing score, then the applicant shall make a written application to the board in accordance with subdivision (a)(1).

If the results of the examination of any applicant are satisfactory to the board, then it shall issue to the applicant a certificate authorizing the applicant to operate as a contractor in this state. The board shall state the construction classifications in which the applicant is qualified to engage as a contractor and for each classification shall list the monetary limitations on the classification as determined by the board.

Whenever any applicant is advised to appear before the board for an interview and fails to appear at the scheduled time and place without notifying the board at least three (3) days in advance, the applicant shall pay an additional fee as set by the board before being rescheduled for an interview. In the event of failure to appear for an interview on three (3) separate occasions, a new application and fee are required.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations that establish uniform criteria to govern issuance by the board of the classifications and monetary limitations required by subdivision (a)(3). The board shall have discretionary authority in individual cases to modify the criteria for an applicant if the public safety and welfare clearly require modification and if the board furnishes the applicant with a written statement justifying modification.

The criteria so established by the board shall include, but not be limited to, a letter of reference from a past client, employer of the applicant or codes administration official, as well as a financial statement of the applicant.

If an applicant requests a monetary limitation of greater than three million dollars ($3,000,000), the applicant's financial statement shall be audited and attested to by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant.

The financial statement of any applicant requesting a monetary limitation of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less shall be either reviewed or audited by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant. The board may, in its discretion, require the financial statement of the applicant be audited and attested to by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant.

The issuance by the board of a certificate of license authorizing the licensee to engage in any major construction classification or classifications of contracting shall not authorize the licensee to engage in twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more of any other major construction classification or specialty classification under the major construction classification unless the licensee is additionally licensed in the other major construction classification or specialty classification under the major construction classification.

A contractor may bid on a contract requiring work in a classification or classifications other than the one in which the contractor is licensed if and only if the contractor has a commercial building contractor's license or if the contractor's license will permit the contractor to perform at least sixty percent (60%) of the bid amount or price of the work for the project being bid or priced; however, the contractor may not actually perform any work in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or, in the case of a limited licensed electrician, where the amount of work is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in any classification unless the contractor has a license to perform work in that classification.

Whenever a partnership licensed as a contractor dissolves, no former member of the partnership shall further undertake contracting before filing a new application with the board and receiving a license.

In the case of a merger, purchase by nonstockholders of the majority interest or reorganization pursuant to a bankruptcy proceeding of any licensee engaged in contracting, the licensee shall make written application to the board and obtain a new license before undertaking contracting.

Upon application of any individual who was formerly a partner in a dissolved partnership, the board shall transfer to the individual the license formerly held by the partnership upon a showing that:

The individual was a partner in a dissolved partnership;

The current financial statement of the individual meets the requirements promulgated by the board. If the financial statement fails to meet the requirements, the board may in its sole discretion modify the monetary limitation prior to transfer; and

All liabilities of the partnership were satisfied prior to dissolution or will be satisfied by the individual.

The board shall collect a fee as set by the board for transferring the license.

The board shall transfer, upon application and payment of a fee as set by the board, by any proprietorship or partnership that subsequently incorporates as a Tennessee corporation, the license formerly held by the proprietorship or partnership to the corporation upon a showing that:

The officers or directors or management of the corporation were the owners or managers of the proprietorship or partnership;

A copy of the corporation's charter has been filed with the board;

The partnership or proprietorship is currently in good standing with the board;

The current financial statement of the corporation meets the requirements promulgated by the board. If the financial statement fails to meet the requirements, the board may in its sole discretion modify the monetary limitation prior to transfer; and

All liabilities of the proprietorship or partnership were satisfied prior to incorporation or will be satisfied by the corporation.

The board shall develop an application for the transfer of licenses.

Notwithstanding § 56-1-302(a)(7) to the contrary, all revenues generated from licensing fees, penalties, or interest shall be allocated solely to the board for licensing contractors to be utilized for:

The administration and enforcement of this part; and

The purposes set forth in the Go Build Tennessee Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 41.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board may issue a license to any person who establishes the person's competency in any classification by successfully passing a proficiency test or examination for measurement of industry expertise in such work that is administered by the board; and the license shall authorize the licensee to engage in contracting in this state or any of its political subdivisions.

The licensee shall be eligible to contract for such work in any county or municipality upon:

Exhibiting evidence of a current certificate of license to the appropriate local officials;

Paying any local licensing fees in effect on May 8, 1992; and

Paying any inspection or permit fees customarily required by any county or municipality for such work. No county or municipality shall require the state licensee or its employees to pass any county or municipal test or examination; nor shall a county or municipality impose any additional requirements upon the state licensee or its employees, nor in any way discriminate against the state licensee or its employees on the basis of the licensee's nonresidency within the county or municipality.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board may issue a license as a limited licensed electrician to any individual without an examination as required by this part, except as provided in subdivision (j)(3), if the individual makes an application to the board in which the following information is provided:

On September 1, 2000, the applicant was registered in accordance with § 68-102-150; and

Evidence that all fees and taxes relative to the operation of the applicant's electrical work have been paid to the appropriate agencies when the application is filed under this subsection (j); or

A current license or certificate issued by any county or municipality of this state prior to September 1, 2000, that is evidence that the applicant had by examination by an official of the county or municipality demonstrated the qualifications required to perform the electrical contract work within its jurisdiction and was actively engaged in that business on September 1, 2000.

An application for a license under subdivision (j)(1)(A), (j)(1)(B) or (j)(1)(C) shall be filed with the board by July 1, 2001. If a license issued to a limited licensed electrician pursuant to subdivision (j)(1)(A), (j)(1)(B) or (j)(1)(C) is not periodically renewed as provided by this part, then the limited licensed electrician shall be eligible for a license only after the satisfactory completion of the examination required by the board for initial applications.

Any individual who is licensed as a limited licensed electrician under subdivisions (j)(1)(A) and (B) shall be required to have satisfactorily completed the examination of the board to engage in business as a limited licensed electrician in any county or municipality that is within subdivision (j)(1)(C).

Any person who performs electrical work and who is subject to licensure as a limited licensed electrician shall apply to the board for a license. To receive a license, the applicant shall pay a fee as set by the board for the license and shall pass an examination prescribed by the board. The board may administer the examination or may contract for the administration of the examination.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, a license as a limited licensed electrician shall not be required in any municipality or county that issues licenses to persons who perform electrical work in the municipality or county.

Any limited licensed electrician requesting an electrical inspection must first have a license from the board for licensing contractors as required by § 62-6-103.

Any person with knowledge of faulty electrical work performed by a limited licensed electrician must report the electrician to the state board for licensing contractors, which may initiate proceedings against the electrician for the faulty work.

The board for licensing contractors may revoke or suspend the license of a limited licensed electrician for faulty electrical work performed by the licensee.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this section.

The state fire marshal and board for licensing contractors shall formulate a system for inspectors to report to the board any problems they may encounter with the workmanship of a limited licensed electrician. The system shall include the use of inspectors who are employed by the board under § 62-6-107(b).

Any person who holds a current, unexpired license as a limited licensed electrician issued by the board shall be deemed to have met the registration requirements of § 68-102-150.

A licensee may request the board to consider revision of the licensee's classification or classifications or monetary limitation or limitations, or both, at any of its regular meetings. The request shall be made by letter, which shall be accompanied by financial, equipment and experience statements relative to the classification request accurate as of no more than twelve (12) months prior to the date of the request. The request must be received in the office of the board by the last day of the month before the month in which it is to be considered.

If an applicant requests a change in monetary limitation to an amount of three million dollars ($3,000,000) or less, the applicant shall submit a financial statement that has been reviewed or audited by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant. If an applicant requests a change in monetary limitation to an amount greater than three million dollars ($3,000,000), the applicant shall submit a financial statement that has been audited and attested to by a licensed public accountant or certified public accountant.

The board reserves the right to require examination pursuant to a request for change of classification. The board further reserves the right to consider a request for change of classification or limitation at any time, if consideration of the request at the regularly scheduled meeting would cause an undue hardship on the owner and be in the best interest of the public safety and welfare.

Increases within the first year will not be allowed without special permission from the board.

Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, to qualify for the Tennessee mechanical plumbing (CMC-A) license examination, a person must have three (3) years' experience as a plumber prior to taking the examination or have an engineering degree in plumbing or in a mechanical field.

The board shall deny any application for licensure as a contractor if the board determines that the name under which the applicant will be trading is identical with the name being used by an existing licensee, or is so nearly similar to the name being used by an existing licensee that it is likely to cause confusion on the part of the public at large. This subsection (m) shall not apply to any applicant who has acquired an exclusive right to use the name as a registered trademark pursuant to 15 U.S.C. § 1051.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 12; 1977, ch. 101, § 2; 1977, ch. 406, § 2; 1979, ch. 59, § 5; 1980, ch. 652, §§ 2, 4; 1981, ch. 497, §§ 1, 3, 4; T.C.A., § 62-612; Acts 1984, ch. 888, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 245, § 2; 1986, ch. 657, § 1; 1986, ch. 718, § 1; 1988, ch. 758, §§ 3-6, 8; 1989, ch. 487, §§ 4-9; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 135-139; 1991, ch. 217, § 2; 1992, ch. 909, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 395, § 1; 1994, ch. 986, §§ 5-8; 1999, ch. 238, §§ 4, 5, 7; 2000, ch. 876, §§ 2-11; 2004, ch. 516, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 133, § 1; 2007, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 219, § 1; 2007, ch. 460, §§ 4, 5; 2008, ch. 904, § 1; 2010, ch. 950, § 6; 2014, ch. 528, § 1; 2015, ch. 500, § 2; 2017, ch. 237, § 1; 2017, ch. 454, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238, pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number which persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238 is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-102, 62-6-103, 62-6-120, 62-6-130 and 62-6-131.

Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 11 provided that the board shall issue limited licensed electrician licenses beginning September 1, 1999. Section 11 of the act further provided that no person subject to the provisions of this part shall be required to have a limited licensed electrician license until January 1, 2000.

Acts 2010, ch. 950, § 7 provided that the state board for licensing contractors shall charge a licensing fee in an amount sufficient to cover all costs associated with issuing a license to persons performing contracting services in this state as a licensed masonry contractor, as this term is defined in § 62-6-102.

Cross-References. Access to and use of financial statements, § 62-6-124.

Exemption of licensed contractors from licensing provisions for building, and alteration and maintenance contractors, § 7-62-104.

Fire protection sprinkler system contractors, title 62, ch. 32, part 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of separate licensure for different construction classifications, OAG 98-020, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (1/15/98).

A county mechanical code provision which required contractors to identify ownership on firm vehicles did not violate T.C.A. § 62-6-111(i)(2) as it did not impose an additional licensing requirement upon licensees, OAG 01-063, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/20/01).

Amendment 3 (known as the “local hire amendment”) to the Charter of the Metropolitan Government of Nashville and Davidson County conflicts with T.C.A. § 626-111(i)(2)(c). Amendment 3 is therefore invalid to the extent that it contravenes the general law of the State of Tennessee. OAG 15-69, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (10/1/2015).

62-6-112. License classifications — Specialty classifications — Contractor's authority to bid and contract.

There shall be nine (9) major construction classifications in which a contractor may apply for a license, the major classifications being:

Commercial building construction;

Industrial construction;

Heavy construction;

Highway, railroad and airport construction;

Municipal and utility construction;

Mechanical construction;

Electrical construction;

Environmental and special construction; and

Residential construction.

The board shall promulgate by rules or regulations specialty classifications required under each major classification set out in subsection (a). Issuance of a license by the board to a contractor in any major classification automatically includes issuance of a license to the contractor in all specialty classifications included under the major classification.

A contractor may obtain a license in any of the specialty classifications that the board by rule or regulation may promulgate under each major classification, but the license in a specialty classification allows the contractor to bid, contract for or perform contracting work in that specialty classification only.

A contractor may not be licensed in six (6) or more specialty classifications under any one (1) major classification without successfully passing the written or oral examination, or both, for the major classification.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the board may promulgate rules or regulations establishing subclassifications within the residential construction classification for which a limited license may be issued to an applicant who has successfully completed a seminar sponsored by the board in lieu of the written or oral examination, or both, and who has otherwise complied with the requirements of this part.

A commercial building contractor is authorized to bid on and contract for the construction, erection, alteration, repair or demolition of any building or structure for use and occupancy by the general public, including residential construction with more than four (4) units or greater than three (3) stories in height.

A small commercial building contractor is authorized to bid on and contract for the construction, erection, alteration, repair or demolition of any building or structure for use and occupancy by the general public, the total cost of which does not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

Licensed contractors in the category set forth under subdivision (a)(9), licensed on or after January 1, 2009, must complete continuing education, a minimum of eight (8) hours biennially, by a board-approved provider. Proof of compliance with this requirement must be filed with the board biennially in the format required by the board, as a condition for the maintenance or renewal of the license.

Active membership in a professional trade association, approved by the board, qualifies as four (4) hours of continuing education annually. Proof of membership must be filed with the board biennially.

The board shall promulgate rules to effectuate this subsection (g). The rules shall include, at a minimum, provisions allowing online and in-person training. All such rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1994, ch. 986, § 9; 2000, ch. 632, § 1; 2017, ch. 237, § 2; 2019, ch. 186, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-6-112 (Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 13; 1978, ch. 551, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; 1979, ch. 72, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., § 62-613; Acts 1985, ch. 246, § 1; Acts 1989, ch. 16, § 8), concerning recording of certificate of license and renewal thereof and fee, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 487, § 10.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2020, added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 186, § 2. January 1, 2020; provided that, for administrative and rulemaking purposes, the act took effect April 23, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of separate licensure for different construction classifications, OAG 98-020, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (1/15/98).

62-6-113. Issuance of duplicate certificate.

A duplicate license certificate to replace any certificate lost, destroyed or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 14; T.C.A., § 62-614.

62-6-114. Certificate as evidence of rights.

The issuance of a certificate of license shall be evidence that the person, firm or corporation named in the certificate is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a licensed contractor while the license remains unrevoked or unexpired.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 15; 1977, ch. 406, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-615; Acts 1989, ch. 487, § 11.

62-6-115. Corporations and partnerships.

Corporations and partnerships may engage in the business of contracting; provided, that at least one (1) of the major stockholders or partners or full-time employees with a written power of attorney to bind the corporation or partnership has sufficient knowledge of the construction business in which the persons are licensed to perform. If the person who took the examination for the partnership or corporation leaves the firm for any reason, the partnership or corporation must designate an individual to take the examination within three (3) months.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 16; T.C.A., § 62-616; Acts 1989, ch. 487, § 12; 1993, ch. 214, § 1; 1994, ch. 986, § 10.

62-6-116. Expiration of license — Renewal.

A certificate of license expires on the last day of the twenty-fourth month following its issuance or renewal and becomes invalid on that date unless renewed.

Renewal notices shall be mailed ninety (90) days prior to the expiration date of the license. The renewal must be received in the office of the board thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the license.

Renewal may be effected at any time during the thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of the license by filing with the board a financial statement, a report of any personal or corporate bankruptcies and other information that the board may require, by the payment of a fee as set by the board and by submitting evidence of the applicant's current workers' compensation insurance coverage. Failure to provide evidence of workers' compensation insurance coverage shall make the applicant ineligible for renewal until evidence of insurance coverage is provided.

A renewal application for a monetary limitation greater than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be accompanied by a reviewed or audited financial statement prepared by a licensed public accountant or a certified public accountant. If a renewal applicant requests a monetary limitation of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) or less, the applicant shall submit a notarized statement that the information contained in the financial statement is true and correct.

It is the duty of the executive director to notify by mail every person licensed under this part of the date of expiration of this certificate of license and the amount of fee required for its renewal for two (2) years. Notice shall be mailed in accordance with this section.

The fee to be paid for the renewal of a certificate of license after the expiration date shall be increased ten percent (10%) for each month or fraction of a month that payment for renewal is delayed. The maximum fee for a delayed renewal shall not exceed twice the normal fee.

No contractor shall be qualified to receive a renewal license when the contractor has been in default in complying with this part for a period of one (1) year and in such event the contractor, in order to qualify under the law, shall make a new application as in the case of the issuance of the original license.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations that establish uniform criteria to govern the review and adjustment of the general construction classifications, specialty classifications and monetary limitations of certificates of license that are subject to renewal by the board. The criteria shall also establish a method for identifying those licensees applying for renewal who may require a greater degree of scrutiny by the board than usual.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 17; 1977, ch. 406, § 4; 1979, ch. 59, § 6; T.C.A., § 62-617; Acts 1984, ch. 888, § 3; 1988, ch. 758, § 7; 1989, ch. 487, §§ 13, 14; 1989, ch. 523, § 140; 1994, ch. 986, § 11; 2000, ch. 865, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 516, § 3; 2005, ch. 133, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, Ch. 865, § 3, provided that it is the intention of the general assembly that the board adjust its fee schedule to reflect the change in licensure period from annual to biennial licensure. It is not the intention of the general assembly to decrease the fees levied for licensure by the change in licensure period.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-6-117. Certificate issued to person who enters or has entered military service.

Any certificate of license issued by the state board for licensing contractors to any person now in any branch of the armed service of the United States or who hereafter enlists or is called into service remains in full force and effect until one (1) year after the person is discharged from service and is subject to renewal at that time by the payment of the annual fee set out in this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 18; T.C.A., § 62-618.

62-6-118. Revocation or suspension of license — Reissuance.

Whenever any person, firm or corporation claims to have been damaged or injured by the gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonest dealing or misconduct in the practice of contracting on the part of any person, firm or corporation licensed under this part files suit upon the claim in any of the courts of record in this state and recovers judgment on the claim, the court may, as a part of its decree or judgment in the case, revoke the certificate of license under which the contractor is operating at the time of the wrongdoing.

The board shall revoke the license of any contractor, home improvement contractor or home improvement services provider upon receiving notification from the court in accordance with § 39-14-154(d) of such person's conviction for a violation of § 39-14-154.

It is the duty of the clerk of the court to notify the executive director of the board of the revocation.

The board may reissue a license to any person, firm or corporation whose license has been revoked; provided, that a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of reissuance for reasons the board may deem sufficient.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1):

If a person, firm or corporation's license was revoked based on a conviction for a violation of § 39-14-154, the board shall not reissue the license until the person, firm or corporation has served the entire term of the sentence imposed as a result of such violation; and

If a person, firm or corporation's license was revoked based on a second or subsequent conviction for a violation of § 39-14-154, the board shall not reissue the license.

The executive director shall immediately notify the secretary of state and the clerk of each county of any revocation of a license or the reissuance of a revoked license.

The board has the power to revoke or suspend any license or renewal granted by it for any of the reasons stated in this section, for a failure to observe the terms and conditions of any license or renewal granted under this part or any bylaws, rules or regulations adopted or promulgated by it as provided in § 62-6-108 or for a violation of the terms of any license.

The board shall, in all cases before hearing any charges against a contractor, furnish a written copy of the charges against the accused, including notice of the time and place where the charges will be heard, and give reasonable opportunity for the accused to be present and offer any evidence the accused may wish. The accused shall have the waivable right to an attorney if so desired.

The affirmative vote of a majority of the board is necessary to revoke or suspend a license or renewal.

The board may refuse to issue or renew a license to any person, firm or corporation for lack of financial stability, lack of expertise, submission of false evidence with regard to application of license or renewal, conviction of a felony and any other conduct that constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing or violation of the statute.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 19; 1977, ch. 406, § 5; 1978, ch. 891, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-619; Acts 1991, ch. 272, § 9; 1994, ch. 986, § 12; 2010, ch. 1055, §§ 5, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e) was transferred to § 62-6-120(d) by the code commission in 2009.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1055, § 7 provided that the act shall apply to any contract for home improvement services entered into on or after July 1, 2010.

62-6-119. Bid documents — Penalties.

Any person or entity preparing plans, specifications or any other documentation for inclusion in an invitation to bid or comparable bid document including any electronic bidding documents, shall reference this chapter in such documentation and include a specific statement informing the invited bidder that it is necessary for such bidder to be properly licensed at the time of the bid and provide evidence of compliance with the applicable provisions of this chapter before such bid may be considered.

The person or entity involved in the preparation of the invitation to bid or comparable bid documents, including any electronic bid documents, shall direct that the following information be written upon the bid envelope or provided within the electronic bid document:

The name, license number, expiration date thereof, and license classification of the contractor applying to bid for the prime contract;

The name, license number, expiration date thereof, and license classification of the contractor applying to bid for the masonry contract where the total cost of the materials and labor for the masonry portion of the construction project exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

The name, license number, expiration date thereof, and license classification of the contractor applying to bid for the electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilation, or air conditioning contracts except when such contractor's portion of the construction project is less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

For each vertical closed loop geothermal heating and cooling project, the company name, department of environment and conservation license number, classification (G, L or G,L) and the expiration date, except when the geothermal portion of the construction project is in an amount less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);

Prime contractor bidders who are to perform the masonry portion of the construction project which exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), materials and labor, the electrical, plumbing, heating, ventilation or air conditioning or the geothermal heating and cooling must be so designated; and

Only one (1) contractor in each of the classifications listed above shall be written on the bid envelope or provided within the electronic bid document.

Failure of any bidder to furnish the required information shall void such bid and such bid shall not be considered. Upon opening of the bid envelope or initial opening of an electronic bid, the names of all contractors listed shall be read aloud at the official bid opening and incorporated into the bid. Prior to awarding a contract, the awarding person or entity and its authorized representatives shall verify the accuracy, correctness and completeness of the required information, and any discrepancies found in the spelling of names of bidders, transposition of license numbers, or other similar typographical errors or omissions may be corrected within forty-eight (48) hours after the bid opening excluding weekends and state-recognized holidays.

No invitation to bid may require that any subcontractor be identified, listed or designated until the final bid submission by the prime contractor, or that any prime contractor accept the bid of any subcontractor until the final bid submission by the prime contractor. This subsection (d) shall apply only to design/bid/build procurements where cost is the primary criterion for the contract award.

Any person or entity, public and private, awarding a bid to a contractor who is not licensed in accordance with this chapter shall be subject to the penalty provided in § 62-6-120(b).

Notwithstanding the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, relative to the amount of civil penalties that may be imposed, the board may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for willful violation of this section.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 20; T.C.A., § 62-620; Acts 1986, ch. 718, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 1990, ch. 868, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 247, § 1; 1994, ch. 986, § 13; 1995, ch. 341, § 1; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2001, ch. 222, § 3; 2008, ch. 792, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 768, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 801, § 1; 2011, ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 644, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 12, § 3 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall apply to all bid documents submitted in accordance with § 62-6-119 on or after March 24, 2011.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.